Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202648-4105
Health care staffing agency; prohibited acts.

(1) A health care staffing agency shall not:

(a) Include in any contract with a worker or a health care entity a noncompete clause restricting in any manner the employment opportunities of a worker; or

(b) In any contract with a worker or a health care entity, require payment of liquidated damages, employment fees, or other compensation if the worker is subsequently hired as a permanent employee of the health care entity, except that this subdivision (b) shall not apply to (i) payments made solely by a health care entity pursuant to a contract with a health care staffing agency which provides that the payment amount will be reduced pro rata for each hour of service the worker performs for the entity while on the payroll of such agency and that such amount will be reduced to zero upon completion of no more than seven hundred twenty hours of service for the entity or (ii) payments made by a foreign worker whom the staffing agency assisted in obtaining authorization to work in the United States and the worker was assigned to a single health care entity for an initial term of not less than twenty-four months.

(2) Any clause of a contract that violates this section is void.

Laws 2026, LB921, § 11.
July 1, 2027